Utah statutes.
35A-3-402.   Calculation of General Assistance Grants.

Grants for General Assistance made pursuant to Section 35A-3-401, to the extent that those payments are made on an ongoing basis for persons who are unemployable, shall be:

(1)  within amounts appropriated by the Legislature; and

(2)  calculated in a manner analogous to that provided in Section 35A-3-302.

